Louisiana, session 2026, SB309.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:402.1(A)(2)(d) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§402.1. Driver education; required
A. No application for a license for the operation of a motor vehicle shall be
received from any person making application for the first time unless there is also
submitted with the application, on a form approved by the secretary of the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections, public safety services, written
evidence of the successful completion by the applicant of one of the following:
* * *
(2) A "prelicensing training course" administered by a Class "D" and "E"
driver education provider licensed and contracted pursuant to R.S. 40:1461 for any
person eighteen years or older if a driver education course is not completed. The
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-591 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 309
prelicensing training course shall consist of a minimum of six hours of classroom
instruction and a minimum of eight hours of actual driving instruction, including the
administering of the skills test. A person shall not be allowed to receive more than
four hours of actual driving instruction on any single calendar day. A properly
licensed third-party examiner may, at his discretion, administer the skills test to the
student prior to the conclusion of the eight hours of actual driving instruction. Upon
successful completion of the instruction and skills test, the third-party tester shall
provide the student with a department-approved certificate of successful completion
in a sealed envelope to be delivered to the department. If the student fails to
successfully complete the skills test, the third-party examiner shall issue a
department-approved certificate indicating completion of the driver education course
but failure of the skills test. The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, public
safety services, shall establish rules and regulations to administer and define the
requirements of the course. Oversight review of these rules shall be conducted by the
House and Senate committees on transportation, highways and public works in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. The rules shall provide for:
* * *
(d) Classroom size, pricing, and facilities.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 40:1461(C)(3) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1461. Requirements for private training and driving instructor schools
* * *
C. The commissioner of the office of motor vehicles shall establish rules and
regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act subject to oversight
review by the House and Senate committees on transportation, highways, and public
works, for the following:
* * *
(3) The establishment of the terms, manner, price and location of instruction
and testing for driving courses.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-591 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 309
* * *